Mississippi statutes. Title 23. Elections
Subarticle B. Procedures for Registration.

§ 23-15-31.
Elections to which subarticle applicable; duty, power and authority of certain election officials.

All of the provisions of this subarticle shall be applicable, insofar as possible, to municipal, primary, general and special elections; and wherever therein any duty is imposed or any power or authority is conferred upon the county registrar, county election commissioners or county executive committee with reference to a state and county election, such duty shall likewise be conferred upon the municipal registrar, municipal election commission or municipal executive committee with reference to any municipal election.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-313 [Codes, 1942, § 3203-603; Laws, 1972, ch. 490, § 603; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 337]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 8; Laws of 1993, ch. 528, § 18; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-33.
Registrar to register voters.

Every person entitled to be registered as an elector in compliance with the laws of this state and who has signed his or her name on and properly completed the application for registration to vote shall be registered by the county registrar in the voting precinct of the residence of such person through the Statewide Elections Management System.

Every person entitled to be registered as an elector in compliance with the laws of this state and who registers to vote pursuant to the National Voter Registration Act of 1993 shall be registered by the county registrar in the voting precinct of the residence of such person through the Statewide Elections Management System.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-31 [Codes, 1880, § 106; 1892, § 3611; 1906, § 4117; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6751; 1930, § 6184; 1942, § 3212; Laws, 1955, Ex ch. 99; Laws, 1962, ch. 569, § 2; Laws, 1965 Ex Sess, ch. 13, § 1; Laws, 1978, ch. 393, § 2; Laws, 1984, Ch. 460, § 2; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en. Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 9; Laws, 1991, ch. 440, § 7; Laws, 2000, ch. 430, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 574, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 471, § 1; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-35.
Clerk of municipality to be registrar; registration books; form of application for registration; registration of county electors by clerk.

The clerk of the municipality shall be the registrar of voters of the municipality, and shall take the oath of office prescribed by Section 268 of the Constitution. The municipal registration shall conform to the county registration which shall be a part of the official record of registered voters as contained in the Statewide Elections Management System. The municipal clerk shall comply with all the provisions of law regarding the registration of voters, including the use of the voter registration applications used by county registrars and prescribed by the Secretary of State under Sections 23-15-39 and 23-15-47.

The municipal clerk shall be authorized to register applicants as county electors. The municipal clerk shall forward notice of registration, a copy of the application for registration, and any changes to the registration when they occur, either by certified mail to the county registrar or by personal delivery to the county registrar provided that a numbered receipt is signed by the county registrar in return for the described documents. Upon receipt of the copy of the application for registration or changes to the registration, and if a review of the application indicates that the applicant meets all the criteria necessary to qualify as a county elector, then the county registrar shall make a determination of the county voting precinct in which the person making the application shall be required to vote. The county registrar shall send this county voting precinct information by United States first-class mail, postage prepaid, to the person at the address provided on the application. Any mailing costs incurred by the municipal clerk or the county registrar in effectuating this subsection (2) shall be paid by the county board of supervisors. If a review of the copy of the application for registration or changes to the registration indicates that the applicant is not qualified to vote in the county, the county registrar shall challenge the application. The county election commissioners shall review any challenge or disqualification, after having notified the applicant by certified mail of the challenge or disqualification.

The municipal clerk shall issue to the person making the application a copy of the application and the county registrar shall process the application in accordance with the law regarding the handling of voter registration applications.

The receipt of a copy of the application for registration sent pursuant to Section 23-15-39(3) shall be sufficient to allow the applicant to be registered as an elector in the municipality, provided that such application is not challenged as provided for therein.

The municipal clerk of each municipality shall provide the county registrar in which the municipality is located the information necessary to conform the municipal registration to the county registration which shall be a part of the official record of registered voters as contained in the Statewide Elections Management System. If any changes to the information occur as a result of redistricting, annexation or other reason, it shall be the responsibility of the municipal clerk to timely provide the changes to the county registrar.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §21-11-3 [Codes, 1892, § 3029; 1906, § 3434; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5994; 1930, § 2596; 1942, § 3374-61; Laws, 1904, ch. 158; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 61; Laws, 1984, ch 457, § 3; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 329]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 10; Laws, 1988, ch. 350, § 5; Laws, 2004, ch. 305, § 8; Laws, 2006, ch. 574, § 2; Laws, 2007, ch. 565, § 1; Laws, 2008, ch. 532, § 2; brought forward without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 471, § 6; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-37.
Keeping registration books; registration of voters; voter registration in public schools.

The registrar shall register the electors of his or her county at any time during regular office hours.

The county registrar may keep his or her office open to register voters from 8:00 a.m. until 7:00 p.m., including the noon hour, for the five (5) business days immediately preceding the thirtieth day before any regularly scheduled primary or general election. The county registrar shall also keep his or her office open from 8:00 a.m. until 12:00 noon on the Saturday immediately preceding the thirtieth day before any regularly scheduled primary or general election, unless that Saturday falls on a legal holiday, in which case registration applications submitted on the Monday immediately following the legal holiday shall be accepted and entered in the Statewide Elections Management System for the purpose of enabling such voters to vote in the next primary or general election.

The registrar, or any deputy registrar duly appointed by law, may visit and spend such time as he or she may deem necessary at any location in his or her county, selected by the registrar not less than thirty (30) days before an election, for the purpose of registering voters.

A person who is physically disabled and unable to visit the office of the registrar to register to vote due to such disability may contact the registrar and request that the registrar or the registrar’s deputy visit him or her for the purpose of registering such person to vote. The registrar or the registrar’s deputy shall visit that person as soon as possible after such request and provide the person with an application for registration, if necessary. The completed application for registration shall be executed in the presence of the registrar or the registrar’s deputy.

In the fall and spring of each year the registrar of each county shall furnish all public schools with mail-in voter registration applications. The applications shall be provided in a reasonable time to enable those students who will be eighteen (18) years of age before a general election to be able to vote in the primary and general elections.

Each public school district shall permit access to all public schools of this state for the county registrar or the county registrar’s deputy to register persons who are eligible to vote and to provide voter education.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-29 [Codes, 1892, § 3615; 1906, § 4122; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6756; 1930, § 6183; 1942, § 3211; Laws, 1894, ch. 51; Laws, 1942, ch. 217; Laws, 1952, ch. 399; Laws, 1955, Ex ch. 103; Laws, 1966, ch. 611, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 457, § 5; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 11; Laws, 1988, ch. 350, § 2; Laws, 1991, ch. 440, § 5; Laws, 1997, ch. 314, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 394, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 506, § 1; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2017).

§ 23-15-39.
Form of application for registration; allowances for office supplies; determination on application; notice to applicant; assistance to applicant; voter registration number; fees and costs; forwarding of application.

Applications for registration as electors of this state, which are sworn to and subscribed before the registrar or deputy registrar authorized by law and which are not made by mail, shall be made upon a form established by rule duly adopted by the Secretary of State.

The boards of supervisors shall make proper allowances for office supplies reasonably necessitated by the registration of county electors.

If the applicant indicates on the application that he or she resides within the city limits of a city or town in the county of registration, the county registrar shall process the application for registration or changes to the registration as provided by law.

If the applicant indicates on the application that he or she has previously registered to vote in another county of this state or another state, notice to the voter’s previous county of registration in this state shall be provided by the Statewide Elections Management System. If the voter’s previous place of registration was in another state, notice shall be provided to the voter’s previous state of residence if the Statewide Elections Management System has that capability.

The county registrar shall provide to the person making the application a copy of the application upon which has been written the county voting precinct and municipal voting precinct, if any, in which the person shall vote. Upon entry of the voter registration information into the Statewide Elections Management System, the system shall assign a voter registration number to the person, and the county registrar shall mail the applicant a voter registration card to the mailing address provided on the application.

Any person desiring an application for registration may secure an application from the registrar of the county of which he or she is a resident and may take the application with him or her and secure assistance in completing the application from any person of the applicant’s choice. It shall be the duty of all registrars to furnish applications for registration to all persons requesting them, and it shall likewise be the registrar’s duty to furnish aid and assistance in the completing of the application when requested by an applicant. The application for registration shall be sworn to and subscribed before the registrar or deputy registrar at the municipal clerk’s office, the county registrar’s office or any other location where the applicant is allowed to register to vote. The registrar shall not charge a fee or cost to the applicant for accepting the application or administering the oath or for any other duty imposed by law regarding the registration of electors.

If the person making the application is unable to read or write, for reason of disability or otherwise, he or she shall not be required to personally complete the application in writing and execute the oath. In such cases, the registrar or deputy registrar shall read the application and oath to the person and the person’s answers thereto shall be recorded by the registrar or the registrar’s deputy. The person shall be registered as an elector if he or she otherwise meets the requirements to be registered as an elector. The registrar shall record the responses of the person and the recorded responses shall be retained permanently by the registrar. The county registrar shall enter the voter registration information into the Statewide Elections Management System and designate the entry as an assisted filing.

The receipt of a copy of the application for registration sent pursuant to Section 23-15-35(2) shall be sufficient to allow the applicant to be registered as an elector of this state, if the application is not challenged.

In any case in which the corporate boundaries of a municipality change, whether by annexation or redistricting, the municipal clerk shall, within ten (10) days after approval of the change in corporate boundaries, provide to the county registrar conforming geographic data that is compatible with the Statewide Elections Management System. The data shall be developed by the municipality’s use of a standardized format specified by the Statewide Elections Management System. The county registrar, county election commissioner or other county official, who has completed an annual training seminar sponsored by the Secretary of State pertaining to the implementation of new boundary lines in the Statewide Elections Management System and received certification for that training, shall update the municipal boundary information into the Statewide Elections Management System. The Statewide Elections Management System updates the municipal voter registration records and assigns electors to their municipal voting precincts. The county registrar shall forward to the municipal clerk written notification of the additions and changes, and the municipal clerk shall forward to the affected municipal electors written notification of the additions and changes.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-17 [ (Codes, 1942, § 3209.6; Laws, 1955, Ex ch. 102, § 1; Laws, 1960, ch. 449, § 1; Laws, 1962, ch. 569, § 1; Laws, 1965, Ex Sess, ch. 10, §§ 1-4) and §23-5-303 (Codes, 1942, § 3203-502; Laws, 1972, ch 490, § 502; Laws, 1975, ch 502, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 457, § 1; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch 495, §§ 335, 337]; en Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 12; Laws, 1988, ch. 350, § 3; Laws, 1991, ch. 440, § 8; Laws, 2000, ch. 592, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 308, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 305, § 9; Laws, 2006, ch. 574, § 3; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 2017; brought forward without change, Laws, 2019, ch. 340, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 23-15-41.
Endorsement of application; completion of registration.

When an applicant to register to vote has completed the application form as prescribed by administrative rule, the county registrar shall enter the applicant’s information into the Statewide Elections Management System where the applicant’s status will be marked as “ACTIVE,” “PENDING” or “REJECTED,” and the applicant shall be entitled to register upon his or her request for registration made in person to the registrar, or deputy registrar if a deputy registrar has been appointed. No person other than the registrar, or a deputy registrar, shall register any applicant.

If an applicant is not qualified to register to vote, then the registrar shall enter the applicant’s information into the Statewide Elections Management System and mark the applicant’s status as “PENDING” or “REJECTED,” with the specific reason or reasons for that status noted. The registrar shall notify the election commission of those applicants rejected.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-33 [Codes, 1942, § 3212.5; Laws, 1962, ch. 571, §§ 1-6; Laws, 1965 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 1; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 13; Laws, 1991, ch. 440, § 9; Laws, 2006, ch. 574, § 4; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-43.
Automatic review where person is not approved for registration.

In the event an applicant is not registered, there shall be an automatic review by the county election commissioners under the procedures provided in Sections 23-15-61 through 23-15-79. In addition to the meetings of the election commissioners provided in those sections, the commissioners are required to hold such additional meetings to determine all pending cases of registration on review before the election at which the applicant desires to vote.

It is not the purpose of this section to indicate the decision that should be reached by the election commissioners in certain cases but to define which applicants should receive further examination by providing for an automatic review.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-305 [Codes, 1942, § 3203-503; Laws, 1972, ch. 490, § 503; Laws, 1975, ch. 502, § 2; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 337]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 14; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-45.
Notice to person denied registration.

In the event that registration is denied pending automatic review by the county election commissioners, the registrar shall immediately inform the applicant that the registration is denied and advise the applicant of the date, time and place of the next meeting of the county election commissioners, at which time the applicant may present such evidence either in person or in writing as he deems pertinent to the question of residency.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-307 [Codes, 1942, § 3203-504; Laws, 1972, ch. 490, § 504; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 337]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 15, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§ 23-15-47.
Registering to vote by mail-in application.

Any person who is qualified to register to vote in the State of Mississippi may register to vote by mail-in application in the manner prescribed in this section.

The following procedure shall be used in the registration of electors by mail:

Any qualified elector may register to vote by mailing or delivering a completed mail-in application to his or her county registrar at least thirty (30) days before any election; however, if the thirtieth day to register before an election falls on a Sunday or legal holiday, the registration applications submitted on the business day immediately following the Sunday or legal holiday shall be accepted and entered into the Statewide Elections Management System for the purpose of enabling voters to vote in the next election. The postmark date of a mailed application shall be the applicant’s date of registration.

Upon receipt of a mail-in application, the county registrar shall stamp the application with the date of receipt, and shall verify the application either by matching the applicant’s Mississippi driver’s license number through the Mississippi Department of Public Safety or by matching the applicant’s social security number through the American Association of Motor Vehicle Administrators. Within fourteen (14) days of receipt of a mail-in registration application, the county registrar shall complete action on the application, including any attempts to notify the applicant of the status of his or her application.

If the county registrar determines that the applicant is qualified and his or her application is legible and complete, the county registrar shall mail the applicant written notification that the application has been approved, specifying the county voting precinct, municipal voting precinct, if any, polling place and supervisor district in which the person shall vote. This written notification of approval containing the specified information shall be the voter’s registration card. The registration card shall be provided by the county registrar to the applicant in accordance with Section 23-15-39. Upon entry of the voter registration information into the Statewide Elections Management System, the system shall assign a voter registration number to the applicant. The assigned voter registration number shall be clearly shown on the written notification of approval. In mailing the written notification, the county registrar shall note the following on the envelope: “DO NOT FORWARD”. If any registration notification form is returned as undeliverable, the voter’s registration shall be void.

A mail-in application shall be rejected for any of the following reasons:

An incomplete portion of the application makes it impossible for the registrar to determine the eligibility of the applicant to register;

A portion of the application is illegible in the opinion of the county registrar and makes it impossible to determine the eligibility of the applicant to register;

The county registrar is unable to determine, from the address and information stated on the application, the precinct in which the voter should be assigned or the supervisor district in which he or she is entitled to vote;

The applicant is not qualified to register to vote pursuant to Section 23-15-11;

The county registrar determines that the applicant is already registered as a qualified elector of the county;

The county registrar is unable to verify the application pursuant to subsection (2)(b) of this section.

If the mail-in application of a person is subject to rejection for any of the reasons set forth in paragraph (d)(i) through (iii) of this subsection, and it appears to the county registrar that the defect or omission is of such a minor nature and that any necessary additional information may be supplied by the applicant over the telephone or by further correspondence, the county registrar may write or call the applicant at the telephone number or address, or both, provided on the application. If the county registrar is able to contact the applicant by mail or telephone, the county registrar shall attempt to ascertain the necessary information, and if this information is sufficient for the registrar to complete the application, the applicant shall be registered. If the necessary information cannot be obtained by mail or telephone, or is not sufficient to complete the application within fourteen (14) days of receipt, the county registrar shall give the applicant written notice of the rejection and provide the reason for the rejection. The county registrar shall further inform the applicant that he or she has a right to attempt to register by appearing in person or by filing another mail-in application.

If a mail-in application is subject to rejection for the reason stated in paragraph (d) (v) of this subsection and the “present home address” portion of the application is different from the residence address for the applicant found in the Statewide Elections Management System, the mail-in application shall be deemed a written request to update the voter’s registration pursuant to Section 23-15-13. The county registrar or the election commissioners shall update the voter’s residence address in the Statewide Elections Management System and, if necessary, advise the voter of a change in the location of his or her county or municipal polling place by mailing the voter a new voter registration card.

The instructions and the application form for voter registration by mail shall be in a form established by rule duly adopted by the Secretary of State.

The Secretary of State shall prepare and furnish without charge the necessary forms for application for voter registration by mail to each county registrar, municipal clerk, all public schools, each private school that requests such applications, and all public libraries.

The Secretary of State shall distribute without charge sufficient forms for application for voter registration by mail to the Commissioner of Public Safety, who shall distribute the forms to each driver’s license examining and renewal station in the state, and shall ensure that the forms are regularly available to the public at such stations.

Bulk quantities of forms for application for voter registration by mail shall be furnished by the Secretary of State to any person or organization. The Secretary of State shall charge a person or organization the actual cost he or she incurs in providing bulk quantities of forms for application for voter registration to such person or organization.

The originals of completed mail-in applications shall remain on file in the office of the county registrar with copies retained in the Statewide Elections Management System.

If the applicant indicates on the application that he or she resides within the city limits of a city or town in the county of registration, the county registrar shall enter the information into the Statewide Elections Management System.

If the applicant indicates on the application that he or she has previously registered to vote in another county of this state or another state, notice to the voter’s previous county of registration in this state shall be provided through the Statewide Elections Management System. If the voter’s previous place of registration was in another state, notice shall be provided to the voter’s previous state of residence.

Any person who attempts to register to vote by mail shall be subject to the penalties for false registration provided for in Section 23-15-17.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 440, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 528, § 3; Laws, 1994, ch. 600, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 305, § 10; Laws, 2006, ch. 574, § 5; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 13, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2017).

§ 23-15-49.
Change of voter registration information by elector on secured website.

The Secretary of State shall, with the support of the Mississippi Department of Public Safety, establish a secure Internet website to permit registered electors to change their name, address or other information set forth in the elector’s existing voter registration record.

Upon the request of an elector through the secure website, the software used by the Secretary of State for processing applications through the website shall provide for verification that:

The elector has a current and valid Mississippi driver’s license or photo identification card issued by the Mississippi Department of Public Safety and the number for that driver’s license or photo identification card provided by the applicant matches the number for the elector’s driver’s license or photo identification card that is on file with the Mississippi Department of Public Safety;

The name and date of birth provided by the voter matches the name and date of birth that is on file with the Mississippi Department of Public Safety; and

The information provided by the elector matches the information on file with the Mississippi Department of Public Safety.

If any of the information does not match that on file with the Mississippi Department of Public Safety, the changes shall be rejected.

Any person who attempts to change registration information under this section shall be subject to the penalties for false registration provided for in Section 97-13-25.

The Secretary of State and the Department of Public Safety shall enter into a memorandum of understanding providing for the sharing of information required to facilitate the requirements of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2016, ch. 416, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2016.